Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1222
Board; members; conflict of interest.

No board member shall take any action or make any decision in the discharge of the duties of a member of the board that may constitute a conflict of interest. As soon as a member is aware of a potential conflict or should reasonably be aware of such potential conflict, whichever is sooner, the member shall submit a written statement to the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment describing the matter requiring action or decision and the nature of the potential conflict. The member shall take such action as the director shall advise or prescribe to remove the member from influence over the action or decision on the matter. For purposes of this section, conflict of interest includes financial, professional, or personal obligations that may compromise or present the appearance of compromising the judgment of a member in the performance of the duties of a member of the board. The director may establish a definition of conflicts of interest for members of the board and may establish procedures in case such a conflict arises.

Laws 2021, LB148, § 60;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 263.